
Your gateway to health and human services!
Apply for services, access your case details, and manage your account anytime at your convenience.
Available online 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.
OneStop is the central hub for Maryland State licenses, forms, certificates, permits, applications, and registrations.
Visit the Governor's Office.
Learn more about the safety, efficacy, and distribution of COVID-19 vaccines in Maryland.
© 2023 Maryland.gov.
All rights reserved.
100 Community Place, Crownsville, MD 21032.
1-877-634-6361
Highlighted here: Chesapeake Bay Bridge, Baltimore's Inner Harbor, Enjoy Maryland's 3100 miles of beaches, Ft. McHenry, and Solomon's Island waterfront.
Drop clip here...
No suggestions at this time.
The State of Maryland pledges to provide constituents, businesses, customers, and 

							stakeholders with friendly and courteous, timely and responsive, accurate and consistent, 

							accessible and convenient, and truthful and transparent services.
Before its coastline was explored by Europeans in the 16th century, Maryland was inhabited by several groups of Native Americans – mostly by Algonquian peoples and, to a lesser degree, Iroquoian and Siouan.
[13] As one of the original Thirteen Colonies of England, Maryland was founded by George Calvert, 1st Baron Baltimore, a Catholic convert[14][15] who sought to provide a religious haven for Catholics persecuted in England.
[16] In 1632, Charles I of England granted Lord Baltimore a colonial charter, naming the colony after his wife, Henrietta Maria.
[17] Unlike the Pilgrims and Puritans, who rejected Catholicism in their settlements, Lord Baltimore envisioned a colony where people of different religious sects would coexist under the principle of toleration.
[16] Accordingly, in 1649 the Maryland General Assembly passed an Act Concerning Religion, which enshrined this principle by penalizing anyone who "reproached" a fellow Marylander based on religious affiliation.
[18] Nevertheless, religious strife was common in the early years, and Catholics remained a minority, albeit in greater numbers than in any other English colony.
Maryland's early settlements and population centers clustered around rivers and other waterways that empty into the Chesapeake Bay.
Its economy was heavily plantation-based and centered mostly on the cultivation of tobacco.
Demand for cheap labor from Maryland colonists led to the importation of numerous indentured servants and enslaved Africans.
In 1760, Maryland's current boundaries took form following the settlement of a long-running border dispute with Pennsylvania.
Maryland was an active participant in the events leading up to the American Revolution, and by 1776, its delegates signed the Declaration of Independence.
Many of its citizens subsequently played key political and military roles in the war.
In 1790, the state ceded land for the establishment of the U.S. capital of Washington, D.C.
Although then a slave state, Maryland remained in the Union during the American Civil War, its strategic location giving it a significant role in the conflict.
After the Civil War, Maryland took part in the Industrial Revolution, driven by its seaports, railroad networks, and mass immigration from Europe.
Since the 1940s, the state's population has grown rapidly, to approximately six million residents, and it is among the most densely populated U.S. states.
As of 2015[update], Maryland had the highest median household income of any state, owing in large part to its proximity to Washington, D.C., and a highly diversified economy spanning manufacturing, retail services, public administration,  real estate, higher education, information technology, defense contracting, health care, and biotechnology.
[19] Maryland is one of the most multicultural states in the country; it is one of the six states where non-Whites compose a majority of the population, with the fifth-highest percentage of African Americans, and high numbers of residents born in Africa, Asia, Central America, and the Caribbean.
The state's central role in U.S. history is reflected by its hosting of some of the highest numbers of historic landmarks per capita.
Sixteen of Maryland's twenty-three counties, as well as the city of Baltimore, border the tidal waters of the Chesapeake Bay estuary and its many tributaries,[20][10] which combined total more than 4,000 miles of shoreline.
Although one of the smallest states in the U.S., it features a variety of climates and topographical features that have earned it the moniker of America in Miniature.
[21] In a similar vein, Maryland's geography, culture, and history combine elements of the Mid-Atlantic, Northeastern, and Southern regions of the country.
George Calvert, 1st Baron Baltimore (1579–1632), sought a charter from King Charles I for the territory between Massachusetts to the north and Virginia to the immediate south.
[22]
After Baltimore died in April 1632, the charter was granted to his son, Cecilius Calvert, 2nd Baron Baltimore (1605–1675), on June 20, 1632.
Officially, the new "Maryland Colony" was named in honor of Henrietta Maria of France, wife of Charles I.
[23] Lord Baltimore initially proposed the name "Crescentia", the land of growth or increase, but "the King proposed Terra Mariae [Mary Land], which was concluded on and Inserted in the bill.
"[16]

The original capital of Maryland was St. Mary's City, on the north shore of the Potomac River, and the county surrounding it, the first erected/created in the province,[24] was first called Augusta Carolina, after the King, and later named St. Mary's County.
[25]

Lord Baltimore's first settlers arrived in the new colony in March 1634, with his younger brother the Honorable Leonard Calvert (1606–1647), as first provincial Governor of Maryland.
They made their first permanent settlement at St. Mary's City in what is now St. Mary's County.
They purchased the site from the paramount chief of the region, who was eager to establish trade.
St. Mary's became the first capital of Maryland, and remained so for 60 years until 1695.
More settlers soon followed.
Their tobacco crops were successful and quickly made the new colony profitable.
However, given the incidence of malaria, yellow fever, and typhoid, life expectancy in Maryland was about 10 years less than in New England.
[26]

Maryland was founded to provide a haven for England's Roman Catholic minority.
[27]
Although Maryland was the most heavily Catholic of the English mainland colonies, the religion was still in the minority, consisting of less than 10% of the total population.
[28]

In 1642, a number of Puritans left Virginia for Maryland and founded Providence (now called Annapolis) on the western shore of the upper Chesapeake Bay.
[29] A dispute with traders from Virginia over Kent Island in the Chesapeake led to armed conflict.
In 1644, William Claiborne, a Puritan, seized Kent Island while his associate, the pro-Parliament Puritan Richard Ingle, took over St.
Mary's.
[30] Both used religion as a tool to gain popular support.
The two years from 1644 to 1646 when Claiborne and his Puritan associates held sway were known as "The Plundering Time".
They captured Jesuit priests, imprisoned them, then sent them back to England.
In 1646, Leonard Calvert returned with troops, recaptured St. Mary's City, and restored order.
The House of Delegates passed the "Act concerning Religion" in 1649 granting religious liberty to all Trinitarian Christians.
[26]

In 1650, the Puritans revolted against the proprietary government.
"Protestants swept the Catholics out of the legislature ... and religious strife returned.
"[26] The Puritans set up a new government prohibiting both Roman Catholicism and Anglicanism.
The Puritan revolutionary government persecuted Maryland Catholics during its reign, known as the "plundering time".
Mobs burned down all the original Catholic churches of southern Maryland.
The Puritan rule lasted until 1658 when the Calvert family and Lord Baltimore regained proprietary control and re-enacted the Toleration Act.
After England's "Glorious Revolution" of 1688, Maryland outlawed Catholicism.
In 1704, the Maryland General Assembly prohibited Catholics from operating schools, limited the corporate ownership of property to hamper religious orders from expanding or supporting themselves, and encouraged the conversion of Catholic children.
[28] The celebration of the Catholic sacraments was also officially restricted.
This state of affairs lasted until after the American Revolutionary War (1775–1783).
Wealthy Catholic planters built chapels on their land to practice their religion in relative secrecy.
Into the 18th century, individual priests and lay leaders claimed Maryland farms belonging to the Jesuits as personal property and bequeathed them in order to evade the legal restrictions on religious organizations' owning property.
[28]

The royal charter granted Maryland the land north of the Potomac River up to the 40th parallel.
A problem arose when Charles II granted a charter for Pennsylvania.
The grant defined Pennsylvania's southern border as identical to Maryland's northern border, the 40th parallel.
But the grant indicated that Charles II and William Penn assumed the 40th parallel would pass close to New Castle, Delaware when it falls north of Philadelphia, the site of which Penn had already selected for his colony's capital city.
Negotiations ensued after the problem was discovered in 1681.
A compromise proposed by Charles II in 1682 was undermined by Penn's receiving the additional grant of what is now Delaware.
[32] Penn successfully argued that the Maryland charter entitled Lord Baltimore only to unsettled lands, and Dutch settlement in Delaware predated his charter.
The dispute remained unresolved for nearly a century, carried on by the descendants of William Penn and Lord Baltimore—the Calvert family, which controlled Maryland, and the Penn family, which controlled Pennsylvania.
[32]

The border dispute with Pennsylvania led to Cresap's War in the 1730s.
Hostilities erupted in 1730 and escalated through the first half of the decade, culminating in the deployment of military forces by Maryland in 1736 and by Pennsylvania in 1737.
The armed phase of the conflict ended in May 1738 with the intervention of King George II, who compelled the negotiation of a cease-fire.
A provisional agreement had been established in 1732.
[32]

Negotiations continued until a final agreement was signed in 1760.
The agreement defined the border between Maryland and Pennsylvania as the line of latitude now known as the Mason–Dixon line.
Maryland's border with Delaware was based on a Transpeninsular Line and the Twelve-Mile Circle around New Castle.
[32]

Most of the English colonists arrived in Maryland as indentured servants, and had to serve a several years' term as laborers to pay for their passage.
[33] In the early years, the line between indentured servants and African slaves or laborers was fluid, and white and black laborers commonly lived and worked together, and formed unions.
Mixed-race children born to white mothers were considered free by the principle of partus sequitur ventrem, by which children took the social status of their mothers, a principle of slave law that was adopted throughout the colonies, following Virginia in 1662.
Many of the free black families migrated to Delaware, where land was cheaper.
[34] As the flow of indentured laborers to the colony decreased with improving economic conditions in England, planters in Maryland imported thousands more slaves and racial caste lines hardened.
Maryland was one of the thirteen colonies that revolted against British rule in the American Revolution.
Near the end of the American Revolutionary War (1775–1783), on February 2, 1781, Maryland became the last and 13th state to approve the ratification of the Articles of Confederation and Perpetual Union, first proposed in 1776 and adopted by the Second Continental Congress in 1778, which brought into being the United States as a united, sovereign and national state.
It also became the seventh state admitted to the Union after ratifying the new federal Constitution in 1788.
In December 1790, Maryland donated land selected by first President George Washington to the federal government for the creation of the new national capital of Washington, D.C.
The land was provided along the north shore of the Potomac River from Montgomery and Prince George's counties, as well as from Fairfax County and Alexandria on the south shore of the Potomac in Virginia; however, the land donated by the Commonwealth of Virginia was later returned to that state by the District of Columbia retrocession in 1846.
Influenced by a changing economy, revolutionary ideals, and preaching by ministers, numerous planters in Maryland freed their slaves in the 20 years after the Revolutionary War.
Across the Upper South the free black population increased from less than 1% before the war to 14% by 1810.
[35] Abolitionists Harriet Tubman and Frederick Douglass were born slaves during this time in Dorchester County and Talbot County, respectively.
[36][37]

During the War of 1812, the British military attempted to capture Baltimore, which was protected by Fort McHenry.
During this bombardment the song "Star-Spangled Banner" was written by Francis Scott Key; it was later adopted as the national anthem.
The National Road (U.S. Hwy 40 today) was authorized in 1817 and ran from Baltimore to St. Louis—the first federal highway.
The Baltimore and Ohio Railroad (B&O) was the first chartered railroad in the United States.
It opened its first section of track for regular operation in 1830 between Baltimore and Ellicott City,[38] and in 1852 it became the first rail line to reach the Ohio River from the eastern seaboard.
[39]

The state remained with the Union during the Civil War,[40] due in significant part to demographics and Federal intervention.
The 1860 census, held shortly before the outbreak of the civil war, showed that 49% of Maryland's African Americans were free.
[35]

Governor Thomas Holliday Hicks suspended the state legislature, and to help ensure the election of a new pro-union governor and legislature, President Abraham Lincoln had a number of its pro-slavery politicians arrested, including the Mayor of Baltimore, George William Brown; suspended several civil liberties, including habeas corpus; and ordered artillery placed on Federal Hill overlooking Baltimore.
In April 1861, Federal units and state regiments were attacked as they marched through Baltimore, sparking the Baltimore riot of 1861, the first bloodshed in the Civil War.
[41] Of the 115,000 Marylanders who joined the military during the Civil War, around 85,000, or 77%, joined the Union army, while the remainder joined the Confederate Army.
[citation needed] The largest and most significant battle in the state was the Battle of Antietam on September 17, 1862, near Sharpsburg.
Although a tactical draw, the battle was considered a strategic Union victory and a turning point of the war.
A new state constitution in 1864 abolished slavery and Maryland was first recognized as a "Free State" in that context.
[42] Following passage of constitutional amendments that granted voting rights to freedmen, in 1867 the state extended suffrage to non-white males.
The Democratic Party rapidly regained power in the state from Republicans.
Democrats replaced the Constitution of 1864 with the Constitution of 1867.
Following the end of Reconstruction in 1877, Democrats devised means of disenfranchising blacks, initially by physical intimidation and voter fraud, later by constitutional amendments and laws.
Blacks and immigrants, however, resisted Democratic Party disfranchisement efforts in the state.
Maryland blacks were part of a biracial Republican coalition elected to state government in 1896–1904 and comprised 20% of the electorate.
[43]

Compared to some other states, blacks were better established both before and after the civil war.
Nearly half the black population was free before the war, and some had accumulated property.
Half the population lived in cities.
Literacy was high among blacks and, as Democrats crafted means to exclude them, suffrage campaigns helped reach blacks and teach them how to resist.
[43] Whites did impose racial segregation in public facilities and Jim Crow laws, which effectively lasted until the passage of federal civil rights legislation in the mid-1960s.
Baltimore grew significantly during the Industrial Revolution, due in large part to its seaport and good railroad connections, attracting European immigrant labor.
Many manufacturing businesses were established in the Baltimore area after the Civil War.
Baltimore businessmen, including Johns Hopkins, Enoch Pratt, George Peabody, and Henry Walters, founded notable city institutions that bear their names, including respectively a university, library system, music and dance conservatory, and art museum.
Cumberland was Maryland's second-largest city in the 19th century.
Nearby supplies of natural resources along with railroads fostered its growth into a major manufacturing center.
[44]

The Progressive Era of the late 19th and early 20th centuries brought political reforms.
In a series of laws passed between 1892 and 1908, reformers worked for standard state-issued ballots (rather than those distributed and marked by the parties); obtained closed voting booths to prevent party workers from "assisting" voters; initiated primary elections to keep party bosses from selecting candidates; and had candidates listed without party symbols, which discouraged the illiterate from participating.
These measures worked against ill-educated whites and blacks.
Blacks resisted such efforts, with suffrage groups conducting voter education.
Blacks defeated three efforts to disenfranchise them, making alliances with immigrants to resist various Democratic campaigns.
[43] Disenfranchisement bills in 1905, 1907, and 1911 were rebuffed, in large part because of black opposition.
Blacks comprised 20% of the electorate and immigrants comprised 15%, and the legislature had difficulty devising requirements against blacks that did not also disadvantage immigrants.
[43]

The Progressive Era also brought reforms in working conditions for Maryland's labor force.
In 1902, the state regulated conditions in mines; outlawed child laborers under the age of 12; mandated compulsory school attendance; and enacted the nation's first workers' compensation law.
The workers' compensation law was overturned in the courts, but was redrafted and finally enacted in 1910.
The Great Baltimore Fire of 1904 burned for more than 30 hours, destroying 1,526 buildings and spanning 70 city blocks.
More than 1,231 firefighters worked to bring the blaze under control.
With the nation's entry into World War I in 1917, new military bases such as Camp Meade, the Aberdeen Proving Ground, and the Edgewood Arsenal were established.
Existing facilities, including Fort McHenry, were greatly expanded.
After Georgia congressman William D. Upshaw criticized Maryland openly in 1923 for not passing Prohibition laws, Baltimore Sun editor Hamilton Owens coined the "Free State" nickname for Maryland in that context, which was popularized by H. L. Mencken in a series of newspaper editorials.
[42][45]

Maryland's urban and rural communities had different experiences during the Great Depression.
The "Bonus Army" marched through the state in 1932 on its way to Washington, D.C. Maryland instituted its first income tax in 1937 to generate revenue for schools and welfare.
[46]

Passenger and freight steamboat service, once important throughout Chesapeake Bay and its many tributary rivers, ended in 1962.
[47]

Baltimore was a major war production center during World War II.
The biggest operations were Bethlehem Steel's Fairfield Yard, which built Liberty ships; and Glenn Martin, an aircraft manufacturer.
Maryland experienced population growth following World War II.
Beginning in the 1960s, as suburban growth took hold around Washington, D.C. and Baltimore, the state began to take on a more mid-Atlantic culture as opposed to the traditionally Southern and Tidewater culture that previously dominated most of the state.
Agricultural tracts gave way to residential communities, some of them carefully planned such as Columbia, St. Charles, and Montgomery Village.
Concurrently the Interstate Highway System was built throughout the state, most notably I-95, I-695, and the Capital Beltway, altering travel patterns.
In 1952, the eastern and western halves of Maryland were linked for the first time by the Chesapeake Bay Bridge, which replaced a nearby ferry service.
[48]

Maryland's regions experienced economic changes following WWII.
Heavy manufacturing declined in Baltimore.
In Maryland's four westernmost counties, industrial, railroad, and coal mining jobs declined.
On the lower Eastern Shore, family farms were bought up by major concerns and large-scale poultry farms and vegetable farming became prevalent.
In Southern Maryland, tobacco farming nearly vanished due to suburban development and a state tobacco buy-out program in the 1990s.
In an effort to reverse depopulation due to the loss of working-class industries, Baltimore initiated urban renewal projects in the 1960s with Charles Center and the Baltimore World Trade Center.
Some resulted in the break-up of intact residential neighborhoods, producing social volatility, and some older residential areas around the harbor have had units renovated and have become popular with new populations.
Maryland has an area of 12,406.68 square miles (32,133.2 km2) and is comparable in overall area with Belgium [11,787 square miles (30,530 km2)].
[49] It is the 42nd-largest and 9th-smallest state and is closest in size to the state of Hawaii [10,930.98 square miles (28,311.1 km2)], the next smallest state.
The next largest state is Maryland's neighbor, West Virginia, which is nearly twice the size of Maryland [24,229.76 square miles (62,754.8 km2)].
Maryland possesses a variety of topography within its borders, contributing to its nickname America in Miniature.
[50] It ranges from sandy dunes dotted with seagrass in the east, to low marshlands teeming with wildlife and large bald cypress near the Chesapeake Bay, to gently rolling hills of oak forests in the Piedmont Region, and pine groves in the Maryland mountains to the west.
Maryland is bounded on its north by Pennsylvania, on its north and east by Delaware, on its east by the Atlantic Ocean, and on its south and west, across the Potomac River, by West Virginia and Virginia.
The mid-portion of its border with Virginia is interrupted by Washington, D.C., which sits on land that was originally part of Montgomery and Prince George's counties and including the town of Georgetown, Maryland.
This land was ceded to the United States Federal Government in 1790 to form the Washington, D.C. Chesapeake Bay nearly bisects the state, and the counties east of the bay are known collectively as the Eastern Shore.
Most of the state's waterways are part of the Chesapeake Bay watershed, with the exceptions of a tiny portion of extreme western Garrett County (drained by the Youghiogheny River as part of the watershed of the Mississippi River), the eastern half of Worcester County (which drains into Maryland's Atlantic coastal bays), and a small portion of the state's northeast corner (which drains into the Delaware River watershed).
So prominent is the Chesapeake in Maryland's geography and economic life that there has been periodic agitation to change the state's official nickname to the "Bay State", a nickname that has been used by Massachusetts for decades.
The highest point in Maryland, with an elevation of 3,360 feet (1,020 m), is Hoye Crest on Backbone Mountain, in the southwest corner of Garrett County, near the border with West Virginia, and near the headwaters of the North Branch of the Potomac River.
Close to the small town of Hancock, in western Maryland, about two-thirds of the way across the state, less than 2 miles (3.2 km) separates its borders,[51] the Mason–Dixon line to the north, and the northwards-arching Potomac River to the south.
Portions of Maryland are included in various official and unofficial geographic regions.
For example, the Delmarva Peninsula is composed of the Eastern Shore counties of Maryland, the entire state of Delaware, and the two counties that make up the Eastern Shore of Virginia, whereas the westernmost counties of Maryland are considered part of Appalachia.
Much of the Baltimore–Washington corridor lies just south of the Piedmont in the Coastal Plain,[52] though it straddles the border between the two regions.
Earthquakes in Maryland are infrequent and small due to the state's distance from seismic/earthquake zones.
[53][54] The M5.8 Virginia earthquake in 2011 was felt moderately throughout Maryland.
Buildings in the state are not well-designed for earthquakes and can suffer damage easily.
[55]

Maryland has no natural lakes, mostly due to the lack of glacial history in the area.
[56] All lakes in the state today were constructed, mostly via dams.
[57] Buckel's Bog is believed by geologists to have been a remnant of a former natural lake.
[58]

Maryland has shale formations containing natural gas, where fracking is theoretically possible.
[59]

As is typical of states on the East Coast, Maryland's plant life is abundant and healthy.
A modest volume of annual precipitation helps to support many types of plants, including seagrass and various reeds at the smaller end of the spectrum to the gigantic Wye Oak, a huge example of white oak, the state tree, which can grow over 70 feet (21 m) tall.
Middle Atlantic coastal forests, typical of the southeastern Atlantic coastal plain, grow around Chesapeake Bay and on the Delmarva Peninsula.
Moving west, a mixture of Northeastern coastal forests and Southeastern mixed forests cover the central part of the state.
The Appalachian Mountains of western Maryland are home to Appalachian-Blue Ridge forests.
These give way to Appalachian mixed mesophytic forests near the West Virginia border.
[61]

Many foreign species are cultivated in the state, some as ornamentals, others as novelty species.
Included among these are the crape myrtle, Italian cypress, southern magnolia, live oak in the warmer parts of the state,[62] and even hardy palm trees in the warmer central and eastern parts of the state.
[63] USDA plant hardiness zones in the state range from Zones 5 and 6 in the extreme western part of the state to Zone 7 in the central part, and Zone 8 around the southern part of the coast, the bay area, and parts of metropolitan Baltimore.
[64] Invasive plant species, such as kudzu, tree of heaven, multiflora rose, and Japanese stiltgrass, stifle growth of endemic plant life.
[65] Maryland's state flower, the black-eyed susan, grows in abundance in wild flower groups throughout the state.
The state harbors a considerable number of white-tailed deer, especially in the woody and mountainous west of the state, and overpopulation can become a problem.
Mammals can be found ranging from the mountains in the west to the central areas and include black bears,[66] bobcats,[67] foxes, coyotes,[68] raccoons, and otters.
[66]

There is a population of rare wild (feral) horses found on Assateague Island.
[69] They are believed to be descended from horses who escaped from Spanish galleon shipwrecks.
[69] Every year during the last week of July, they are captured and swim across a shallow bay for sale at Chincoteague, Virginia, a conservation technique which ensures the tiny island is not overrun by the horses.
[69] The ponies and their sale were popularized by the children's book, Misty of Chincoteague.
The purebred Chesapeake Bay Retriever dog was bred specifically for water sports, hunting and search and rescue in the Chesapeake area.
[70] In 1878, the Chesapeake Bay Retriever was the first individual retriever breed recognized by the American Kennel Club.
[70] and was later adopted by the University of Maryland, Baltimore County as their mascot.
Maryland's reptile and amphibian population includes the diamondback terrapin turtle, which was adopted as the mascot of University of Maryland, College Park, as well as the threatened Eastern box turtle.
[71] The state is part of the territory of the Baltimore oriole, which is the official state bird and mascot of the MLB team the Baltimore Orioles.
[72] Aside from the oriole, 435 other species of birds have been reported from Maryland.
[73]

The state insect is the Baltimore checkerspot butterfly, although it is not as common in Maryland as it is in the southern edge of its range.
[74]

Maryland joined with neighboring states during the end of the 20th century to improve the health of the Chesapeake Bay.
The bay's aquatic life and seafood industry have been threatened by development and by fertilizer and livestock waste entering the bay.
[75][76]

In 2007, Forbes.com rated Maryland as the fifth "Greenest" state in the country, behind three of the Pacific States and Vermont.
Maryland ranks 40th in total energy consumption nationwide, and it managed less toxic waste per capita than all but six states in 2005.
[77] In April 2007, Maryland joined the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative (RGGI) — a regional initiative, formed by all the Northeastern states, Washington, D.C., and three Canadian provinces, to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
[78] In March 2017, Maryland became the first state with proven gas reserves to ban fracking by passing a law against it.
Vermont has such a law, but no shale gas, and New York has such a ban, though it was made by executive order.
[59]

Maryland has a wide array of climates, due to local variances in elevation, proximity to water, and protection from colder weather due to downslope winds.
The eastern half of Maryland — which includes the cities of Ocean City, Salisbury, Annapolis, and the southern and eastern suburbs of Washington, D.C., and Baltimore — lies on the Atlantic Coastal Plain, with flat topography and sandy or muddy soil.
This region has a humid subtropical climate (Köppen Cfa), with hot, humid summers and cool to cold winters; it falls under USDA Hardiness zone 8a.
[64]

In western Maryland, the higher elevations of Allegany and Garrett counties, including the cities of Cumberland, Frostburg, and Oakland, display more characteristics of the humid continental zone, due in part to elevation.
They fall under USDA Hardiness zones 6b and below.
[64]

Precipitation in the state is characteristic of the East Coast.
Annual rainfall ranges from 35 to 45 inches (890 to 1,140 mm) with more in higher elevations.
Nearly every part of Maryland receives 3.5–4.5 inches (89–114 mm) per month of rain.
Average annual snowfall varies from 9 inches (23 cm) in the coastal areas to over 100 inches (250 cm) in the western mountains of the state.
[79]

Because of its location near the Atlantic Coast, Maryland is somewhat vulnerable to tropical cyclones, although the Delmarva Peninsula and the outer banks of North Carolina provide a large buffer, such that strikes from major hurricanes (category 3 or above) occur infrequently.
More often, Maryland gets the remnants of a tropical system that has already come ashore and released most of its energy.
Maryland averages around 30–40 days of thunderstorms a year, and averages around six tornado strikes annually.
[80]

Most of the population of Maryland lives in the central region of the state, in the Baltimore metropolitan area and Washington metropolitan area, both of which are part of the Baltimore–Washington metropolitan area.
The majority of Maryland's population is concentrated in the cities and suburbs surrounding Washington, D.C., as well as in and around Maryland's most populous city, Baltimore.
Historically, these and many other Maryland cities developed along the Fall Line, the line along which rivers, brooks, and streams are interrupted by rapids and waterfalls.
Maryland's capital city, Annapolis, is one exception to this pattern since it lies along the banks of the Severn River, close to where it empties into the Chesapeake Bay.
The Eastern Shore is less populous and more rural, as are the counties of western Maryland.
The two westernmost counties of Maryland, Allegany and Garrett, are mountainous and sparsely populated, resembling West Virginia and Appalachia more than they do the rest of the state.
Both eastern and western Maryland are, however, dotted with cities of regional importance, such as Ocean City, Princess Anne, and Salisbury on the Eastern Shore and Cumberland, Frostburg, and Hancock in Western Maryland.
Southern Maryland is still somewhat rural, but suburbanization from Washington, D.C., has encroached significantly since the 1960s; important local population centers include Lexington Park, Prince Frederick, California, and Waldorf.
[91][92]

In the 2020 United States census, the United States Census Bureau found that population of Maryland was 6,185,278 people, a 7.1% increase from the 2010 United States census.
[93] The United States Census Bureau estimated that the population of Maryland was 6,045,680 on July 1, 2019, a 4.71% increase from the 2010 United States census and an increase of 2,962, from the prior year.
This includes a natural increase since the last census of 269,166 (464,251 births minus 275,093 deaths) and an increase due to net migration of 116,713 people into the state.
Immigration from outside the United States resulted in a net increase of 129,730 people, and migration within the country produced a net loss of 13,017 people.
[94] In 2018, The top countries of origin for Maryland's immigrants were El Salvador (11%), India (6%), China (5%), Nigeria (5%), and the Philippines (4%).
[95] The center of population of Maryland is located on the county line between Anne Arundel County and Howard County, in the unincorporated community of Jessup.
[96]

Maryland's history as a border state has led it to exhibit characteristics of both the Northern and the Southern regions of the United States.
Generally, rural Western Maryland between the West Virginian Panhandle and Pennsylvania has an Appalachian culture; the Southern and Eastern Shore regions of Maryland embody a Southern culture,[97]
while densely populated Central Maryland – radiating outward from Baltimore and Washington, D.C. – has more in common with that of the Northeast.
[98] The U.S. Census Bureau designates Maryland as one of the South Atlantic States, but it is commonly associated with the Mid-Atlantic States and Northeastern United States by other federal agencies, the media, and some residents.
[99][100][101][102][103]

According to HUD's 2022 Annual Homeless Assessment Report, there were an estimated 5,349 homeless people in Maryland.
[104][105]

As of 2011, 58.0 percent of Maryland's population younger than age 1 were minority background.
[106]

Note: Births in the table do not add up because Hispanics are counted both by their ethnicity and by their race, giving a higher overall number.
Since 2016, data for births of White Hispanic origin are not collected, but included in one Hispanic group; persons of Hispanic origin may be of any race.
Racial makeup of Maryland excluding Hispanics from racial categories (2019)[118]
NH = Non-Hispanic

As of 2016, the most spoken languages in Maryland other than English were Spanish (9%), Chinese (1.2%), West African languages (mostly Yoruba and Igbo, 1%), French (1%), Korean (0.7%), Afro-Asiatic languages (mostly Amharic, 0.6%), and Tagalog (0.6%).
Other languages with a large number of speakers in Maryland include Vietnamese (0.4%), Arabic (0.4%), Russian (0.4%), Hindi (0.3%), Urdu (0.3%), Persian (0.3%), Nepali (0.3%), Haitian Creole (0.2%), and Telugu (0.2%) [119][120]

In 1970, the U.S. Census Bureau reported Maryland's population as 17.8 percent African-American and 80.4 percent non-Hispanic White.
[125]

In 2019, non-Hispanic white Americans were 49.8% of Maryland's population (White Americans, including White Hispanics, were 57.3%), which made Maryland a majority minority state.
[126] 50.2% of Maryland's population is non-white, or is Hispanic or Latino, the highest percentage of any state on the East Coast, and the highest percentage after the majority-minority states of Hawaii, New Mexico, Texas, California, and Nevada, along with Washington D.C.[127] By 2031, minorities are projected to become the majority of voting eligible residents of Maryland.
[128] Maryland's multiculturalism and diversity can be explained by its historically large African American population, and immigration brought by the importance of the D.C. and Baltimore areas, especially from Central America, Africa, the Caribbean, and Asia.
African Americans form a sizable portion of the state's population, 31.1% as of 2020.
[124] Most are descendants of people transported to the area as slaves from West Africa.
Concentrations of African Americans live in Baltimore City, Prince George's County, Charles County, western parts of Baltimore County, and the southern Eastern Shore.
Charles County and Prince George's County are the two counties where African Americans are the most successful monetarily in the country, with average household incomes much higher than in the rest of the country.
As a former slave state, Maryland has had a large African-American population for much of its history; African American populations have increased over time with the Great Migration to the D.C. and Baltimore areas, and in more recent times with the New Great Migration and with movement out from Washington D.C. into Montgomery, Prince George's, and Charles counties, as a result of gentrification and rising housing costs in D.C. causing many African Americans to leave.
Prince George's County in particular has been a magnet for African Americans from D.C. to move to for decades; it is often referred to as "Ward 9" of D.C.

Maryland has by far the highest percentage of residents born in Africa out of any state; residents of African descent include 20th-century and later immigrants from Nigeria, particularly of the Igbo and Yoruba tribes; Ethiopia, particularly Amharas with significant Oromo and Tigrayan populations; Cameroon, Ghana, Sierra Leone, and Kenya.
[129] Maryland also hosts populations from other African and Caribbean nations.
Maryland's African immigrant population is generally well-educated and is most concentrated in the inner suburbs of Baltimore and D.C. Nigerians are the fourth-largest immigrant group in Maryland, and are largely concentrated in the Baltimore area and surrounding suburbs, as well as Prince George's county.
Many immigrants from the Horn of Africa, especially Ethiopia, have settled in Maryland, with large communities in the suburbs of Washington, D.C. (particularly Montgomery County and Prince George's County); the Greater Washington area has the world's largest population of Ethiopians outside of Ethiopia.
[130] The Ethiopian community of Greater D.C. was historically based in Washington, D.C.'s Adams Morgan and Shaw neighborhoods, but as the community has grown, many Ethiopians have settled in Silver Spring.
[131] The Ethiopian American population in Maryland and the rest of the D.C. area is largely Amharic-speaking, but there are significant numbers of speakers of Oromo and Tigrinya speakers as well.
The Washington, D.C., metropolitan area is also home to a large Eritrean community.
The top reported ancestries by Maryland residents are: German (15%), Irish (11%), English (8%), American (7%), Italian (6%), and Polish (3%).
[132]

Irish American populations can be found throughout the Baltimore area,[133] and the Northern and Eastern suburbs of Washington, D.C., in Maryland (descendants of those who moved out to the suburbs[134] of Washington's once predominantly Irish neighborhoods[134][135]), as well as Western Maryland, where Irish immigrant laborers helped to build the B&O Railroad.
[133] Smaller but much older Irish populations can be found in Southern Maryland, with some roots dating as far back as the early Maryland colony.
[136] This population, however, still remains culturally very active and yearly festivals are held.
[137]

A large percentage of the population of the Eastern Shore and Southern Maryland are descendants of British American ancestry.
The Eastern Shore was settled by Protestants, chiefly Methodist and the southern counties were initially settled by English Catholics.
Western and northern Maryland have large German-American populations.
More recent European immigrants of the late 19th and early 20th century settled first in Baltimore, attracted to its industrial jobs.
These groups were largely of Jewish, Italian, Greek, Polish, Czech, Lithuanian, Russian and Ukrainian descent.
The Greek community includes a number of Greek Jews.
[138] These Southern and Eastern European immigrants were largely concentrated in Southeast Baltimore and significantly influenced the unique culture of the city; although many have moved out into surrounding areas of Baltimore County due to gentrification, the city retains the culture and influence of these immigrants, and cultural events celebrating these communities are common in Baltimore.
Maryland has had a significant Jewish American presence since the early 20th century, with large numbers of Jewish immigrants to the Baltimore area, followed by Jewish migration to the Washington D.C. area; Maryland has the fifth-highest percentage of Jewish residents in the country (including Washington D.C.), with 239,000 Jews making up 4 percent of the population, and the Washington-Baltimore area having the seventh-largest number of Jews of any combined metropolitan area in the country, with a Jewish population estimated at 300,000.
[citation needed]

The shares of European immigrants born in Eastern Europe increased significantly between 1990 and 2010.
Following the dissolution of the Soviet Union, Yugoslavia, and Czechoslovakia, many immigrants from Eastern Europe came to the United States—12 percent of whom currently reside in Maryland.
[139][140]

Hispanic immigrants of the later 20th century have settled in Aspen Hill, Hyattsville/Langley Park, Glenmont/Wheaton, Bladensburg, Riverdale Park, Gaithersburg, as well as Highlandtown and Greektown in East Baltimore.
Maryland has the highest percentage of residents of Central American origin of any state.
[citation needed] Salvadorans are the largest Hispanic group in Maryland, and Maryland has the largest percentage of Salvadoran residents of any state.
[citation needed] The D.C. area also has the highest percentage of Salvadorans of any American metro area, who are particularly concentrated in Prince George's and Montgomery counties, and has the second-highest total number of Salvadorans after the Los Angeles area.
Other Hispanic groups with significant populations in the state include Mexicans, Guatemalans, Hondurans, Dominicans, Peruvians, and Puerto Ricans, along with growing populations of Brazilians, Colombians, Ecuadorians, and Bolivians.
Maryland's Hispanic population is especially concentrated in Montgomery County and Prince George's County, with other large populations in the Baltimore area and Frederick County.
Maryland has one of the most diverse Hispanic populations in the country, with significant populations from various Caribbean and Central American nations.
[141]

Caribbean Americans have a significant presence in Maryland, especially Jamaican Americans, who make up 0.6% of the population and have had a significant presence and influence in Maryland's politics and culture; Maryland's current governor, Wes Moore, is the son of a Jamaican immigrant mother.
Other Caribbean American nationalities with a large population in Maryland include Dominicans, Haitians, Trinidadians and Tobagonians, and Guyanese.
Caribbean Americans are most concentrated in Prince George's County, the city of Baltimore, and Baltimore County.
Asian Americans are concentrated in the suburban counties surrounding Washington, D.C., and in Baltimore suburbs, especially Howard County, with Chinese American, Korean American and Taiwanese American communities in Rockville, Gaithersburg, and Germantown.
Chinese in particular form the second largest group of Asian Americans, and are the largest group in Montgomery County.
[citation needed] Maryland also has a large Korean American population, especially in Howard County, where there is a Koreatown in Ellicott City.
[142][143] Filipino Americans, the largest group of Southeast Asians, form major communities in Montgomery, Prince George's, and Charles counties; other large groups of Southeast Asians include Vietnamese, who are concentrated in Montgomery County, and Burmese, who are concentrated in Frederick, Howard, and Baltimore Counties.
[citation needed] Maryland has a very large and diverse South Asian American population that has had a major presence in the state since the 1970s.
Indian Americans are the largest Asian group in Maryland, making up 1.7 percent of the population, and live throughout the state, especially in Montgomery and Howard counties, with large numbers in Baltimore, Frederick, and Prince George's counties.
[citation needed] The Indian American population is culturally and linguistically diverse, with the Indian languages spoken most being Hindi, Gujarati, Telugu, and Tamil.
[citation needed] There are also large Pakistani American populations throughout the D.C. and Baltimore areas, especially in Baltimore County and Howard County, and a large Bangladeshi American community in the D.C.
area.
[citation needed] Maryland has one of the largest populations of Nepali Americans, including Bhutanese Americans of Nepali descent, in the U.S., many of whom are recent immigrants or refugees who sought asylum after expulsion from Bhutan or the 2015 Nepal earthquake; there are an estimated 20,000 to 25,000 Nepalis in Maryland, concentrated in the Baltimore area with significant populations in the D.C.
area.
[citation needed] The first Nepali American elected to a state legislature, Harry Bhandari, was elected in Maryland, representing part of Baltimore County.
[144][145]

Attracting educated Asians and Africans to the professional jobs in the region, Maryland has the fifth-largest proportions of racial minorities in the country.
[146]

In 2006, 645,744 were counted as foreign born, which represents mainly people from Latin America and Asia.
About four percent are undocumented immigrants.
[147]

According to The Williams Institute's analysis of the 2010 U.S. census, 12,538 same-sex couples are living in Maryland, representing 5.8 same-sex couples per 1,000 households.
[148]

Maryland has been historically prominent to American Catholic tradition because the English colony of Maryland was intended by George Calvert as a haven for English Catholics.
Baltimore was the seat of the first Catholic bishop in the U.S. (1789), and Emmitsburg was the home and burial place of the first American-born citizen to be canonized, St. Elizabeth Ann Seton.
Georgetown University, the first Catholic University, was founded in 1789 in what was then part of Maryland; it became a part of the District of Columbia when it was created in the 1790s.
The Basilica of the National Shrine of the Assumption of the Virgin Mary in Baltimore was the first Roman Catholic cathedral built in the United States, and the Archbishop of Baltimore is, albeit without formal primacy, the United States' quasi-primate,[citation needed] and often a cardinal.
Among the immigrants of the 19th and 20th centuries from eastern and southern Europe were many Catholics.
Despite its historic relevance to the Catholic Church in the United States, the percentage of Catholics in the state of Maryland is below the national average of 20%.
Demographically, both Protestants and those identifying with no religion are more numerous than Catholics.
According to the Pew Research Center in 2014, 69 percent of Maryland's population identifies themselves as Christian.
Nearly 52% of the adult population are Protestants.
[d] Following Protestantism, Catholicism is the second largest religious affiliation, comprising 15% percent of the population.
[149][150] Amish/Mennonite communities are found in St. Mary's, Garrett, and Cecil counties.
[151] Judaism is the largest non-Christian religion in Maryland, with 241,000 adherents, or four percent of the total population.
[152] Jews are numerous throughout Montgomery County and in Pikesville and Owings Mills northwest of Baltimore.
An estimated 81,500 Jewish Americans live in Montgomery County, constituting approximately 10% of the total population.
[153] The Seventh-day Adventist Church's world headquarters and Ahmadiyya Muslims' national headquarters are located in Silver Spring, just outside Washington, D.C..
Per the Public Religion Research Institute in 2020, 61 percent of Maryland's population identified with Christianity.
[154] Protestantism and Roman Catholicism continued to dominate the Christian landscape, and the Jewish community remained at 3% of the total religious population.
Of the unaffiliated, the PRRI study determined their increase to 28% of the population.
Maryland has one of the highest percentages of LGBT people in its populace out of any state; 5.7% of Marylanders identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, or queer, the highest of any state.
(Washington, D.C. ranks higher with a LGBT population of 8.6%.)
Maryland ranks as one of the best states in the nation for rights of the LGBT community, with protections against discrimination enacted since 2001 for sexuality and 2014 for gender, same-sex marriage legalization in 2013, bans on conversion therapy enacted in 2018, abolition of the gay panic defense in 2021, and issuance in 2023 of an executive order protecting the rights of transgender individuals.
In 2020, Montgomery County unanimously passed an ordinance implementing an LGBTIQ+ bill of rights.
The first person known to describe himself as a drag queen was William Dorsey Swann, born enslaved in Hancock, Maryland.
Swann was the first American on record who pursued legal and political action to defend the LGBTQ community's right to assemble.
[155]

In February 2010, Attorney General Doug Gansler issued an opinion stating that Maryland law should honor same-sex marriages from out of state.
At the time, the state Supreme Court wrote a decision upholding marriage discrimination.
[148]

You made it!
Thanks for stopping by.
We're confident that you'll find all sorts of inspiring and useful things here.
But sometimes it's tough to dig through it all.
Are you more blue crabs by the bay or trails, rides, and hikes all day?
Click that little button to get a sense of what we're all about and why we think you'll like us so much.
Start Here
DestinationMaryland Magazine
Start planning your trip with our free visitor guide.
Get the OfficialMaryland Newsletter
Get email updates about top things to do, travel deals and events.
Tag your photos on Instagram with #MDinFocus
Patricia Hill Collins Honored for Research on Intersections of Gender, Race and Class
City, County and University Leaders Gather to Talk Economic Development, the Quantum Ecosystem and the Purple Line
Gift from Long Jiang Ph.D. '06 Will Support Faculty Research and Doctoral Students in the Robert H. Smith School of Business
Biden Recognizes Jeong H. Kim Ph.D. ’91 for Advances in Broadband Optical Systems, Data Communications, Wireless Technologies
Art + Technology + Social Justice
The Arts for All initiative partners the arts with the sciences, technology and other disciplines to develop new and experiential offerings that nurture different ways of thinking to spark dialogue, understanding, problem solving and action.
More about Arts for All
The University of Maryland, College Park is the state's flagship university and one of the nation's preeminent public research universities.
A global leader in research, entrepreneurship and innovation, the university is home to more than 40,700 students, 14,000 faculty and staff, and nearly 400,000 alumni all dedicated to the pursuit of Fearless Ideas.
Located just outside Washington, D.C., we discover and share new knowledge every day through our renowned research enterprise and programs in academics, the arts and athletics.
And we are committed to social entrepreneurship as the nation’s first “Do Good” campus.
Introducing The Nation's First Do Good Campus Transforming Idealism into Impact 
Top public national university
Source: 2022-23 U.S. News & World Report
Best colleges for LGBTQ+ students
Source: 2023 Campus Pride Index
Among public universities
Source: 2023 Forbes' list of America’s Top Colleges
Undergraduate program for entrepreneurship
Source: The Princeton Review / Entrepreneurship magazine 
Rankings and Fast Facts
Spanning 12 schools and colleges, Maryland offers more than 300 degree-granting programs, many of them ranked among the best in the country.
Our faculty includes two Nobel laureates, three Pulitzer Prize winners, 58 members of the national academies and scores of Fulbright scholars.
And our students, who include the highest achievers in the state and nation, enjoy experiences unique to our location just outside the nation’s capital, including internships, research, and leadership and service opportunities.
The University of Maryland is one of the world’s premier research institutions.
With our strategic location and scores of partnerships with government and businesses, UMD conducts groundbreaking research on some of the biggest challenges facing our global community, including cybersecurity and terrorism, bioengineering, public health equity, food safety and climate change.
We strive to discover new knowledge and put it to work through innovation and entrepreneurship, advancing economic development and transforming lives.
The newly launched Innovation Gateway will guide you to the resources, programs, partners, and spaces you need to activate and scale your fearless ideas into innovations that launch new ventures, catalyze growth, and advance economic development.
To improve the lives of every person on Earth, we will reimagine teaching and learning; accelerate solutions to the grand challenges of our time through creativity and discovery; and forge a diverse and inclusive community where our differences are celebrated and equity is relentlessly pursued.
Together, we will dedicate ourselves to advancing the public good because our individual well-being is enduringly bound to our collective well-being.
Read the Strategic Plan
At the University of Maryland, the arts, the humanities and the sciences intersect to address important societal issues and shed new light on the human experience.
Our vibrant campus arts community collaborates with local and national cultural organizations such as the Phillips Collection, Kennedy Center and Folger Shakespeare Library.
Student and faculty artists, designers, historians, writers and performers are exploring new media, presenting new perspectives, investigating new techniques and engaging new audiences.
WE ARE TerrapinSTRONG.
If you want to join a community striving for equity, inclusion and social justice, you belong here.
- Darryll J. Pines, President
More about TerrapinSTRONG
Home of the Terrapins, the University of Maryland has one of the nation’s most recognizable and successful athletics programs.
More than 550 student-athletes compete each year in 20 intercollegiate sports—12 for women and eight for men.
Since 2005 alone, Maryland has won 19 national championships, including NCAA titles in women’s basketball, men’s soccer, men's lacrosse, women’s lacrosse, and field hockey.
Since joining the Big Ten Conference in 2014, UMD has won a combined 32 regular season and tournament championships.
Fear the Turtle!
The University of Maryland is proud to be the nation's first Do Good Campus.
Remember that college experience or course that changed you?
The one that got you excited about learning and what you wanted to do with your life?
Imagine a campus where most of your college experiences were that inspiring and enabled you to Do Good.
Learn more about Do Good
The Terp experience extends beyond classrooms, labs and studios.
It encompasses residence halls and dining halls, clubs and sports, fraternities and sororities, campus events and performances, and countless off-campus destinations.
Maryland touts 800-plus student organizations, dozens of prestigious living and learning communities, and countless other ways to get involved.
Students here can create a unique identity and grow as individuals, even as they’re part of a close-knit and diverse community.
Support the Clark Challenge for the Maryland Promise Scholarship and double your impact through the Clark Challenge
Keep Learning!
Earn up to four credits in just three weeks.
Courses offered on campus or anywhere online.
Meet your goals with University of Maryland’s Winter Session, January 2-22, 2024.
Learn more at winter.umd.edu.
Latest news at Maryland Today
For media releases visit UMD Right Now
Explore events on the Campus Calendar
Terps are bold, smart, curious and proud.
We do good, in our communities and out in the world.
We are fearless.
And we are always looking to expand our ranks.
Interested in becoming a University of Maryland student?
This is where to start.
Giving back is a fearless Terp tradition, and there are many ways you can not only keep it alive, but also make an instant impact.
Give Now

Support the Clark Challenge for the Maryland Promise Scholarship and double your impact through the Clark Challenge.
University of Maryland on YouTube
University of Maryland on Facebook
University of Maryland on Twitter
University of Maryland on Instagram
 


Sources
https://www.maryland.gov/
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Maryland
https://www.visitmaryland.org/
https://umd.edu/
https://umterps.com/

Relates Words:
[gateway, health, human, services, ]
[apply, services, access, case, details, manage, account, anytime, convenience, ]
[available, online, 24, hours, day, 7, days, week, ]
[onestop, central, hub, maryland, state, licenses, forms, certificates, permits, applications, registrations, ]
[visit, governor, office, ]
[learn, safety, efficacy, distribution, vaccines, maryland, ]
[2023, ]
[rights, reserved, ]
[100, community, place, crownsville, md, 21032, ]
[highlighted, chesapeake, bay, bridge, baltimore, inner, harbor, enjoy, maryland, 3100, miles, beaches, mchenry, solomon, island, waterfront, ]
[drop, clip, suggestions, time, ]
[state, maryland, pledges, provide, constituents, businesses, customers, stakeholders, friendly, courteous, timely, responsive, accurate, consistent, accessible, convenient, truthful, transparent, services, ]
[coastline, explored, europeans, 16th, century, maryland, inhabited, several, groups, native, americans, mostly, algonquian, peoples, lesser, degree, iroquoian, siouan, ]
[13, one, original, thirteen, colonies, england, maryland, founded, george, calvert, 1st, baron, baltimore, catholic, convert, 14, 15, sought, provide, religious, catholics, persecuted, england, ]
[16, 1632, charles, england, granted, lord, baltimore, colonial, charter, naming, colony, wife, henrietta, maria, ]
[17, unlike, pilgrims, puritans, rejected, catholicism, settlements, lord, baltimore, envisioned, colony, people, different, religious, sects, would, coexist, principle, toleration, ]
[16, accordingly, 1649, maryland, general, assembly, passed, act, concerning, religion, enshrined, principle, penalizing, anyone, reproached, fellow, marylander, based, religious, affiliation, ]
[18, nevertheless, religious, strife, common, early, years, catholics, remained, minority, albeit, greater, numbers, english, colony, ]
[maryland, early, settlements, population, centers, clustered, around, rivers, waterways, empty, chesapeake, bay, ]
[economy, heavily, centered, mostly, cultivation, tobacco, ]
[demand, cheap, labor, maryland, colonists, led, importation, numerous, indentured, servants, enslaved, africans, ]
[1760, maryland, current, boundaries, took, form, following, settlement, border, dispute, pennsylvania, ]
[maryland, active, participant, events, leading, american, revolution, 1776, delegates, signed, declaration, independence, ]
[many, citizens, subsequently, played, key, political, military, roles, war, ]
[1790, state, ceded, land, establishment, capital, washington, ]
[although, slave, state, maryland, remained, union, american, civil, war, strategic, location, giving, significant, role, conflict, ]
[civil, war, maryland, took, part, industrial, revolution, driven, seaports, railroad, networks, mass, immigration, europe, ]
[since, 1940s, state, population, grown, rapidly, approximately, six, million, residents, among, densely, populated, states, ]
[2015, update, maryland, highest, median, household, income, state, owing, large, part, proximity, washington, highly, diversified, economy, spanning, manufacturing, retail, services, public, administration, real, estate, higher, education, information, technology, defense, contracting, health, care, biotechnology, ]
[19, maryland, one, multicultural, states, country, one, six, states, compose, majority, population, percentage, african, americans, high, numbers, residents, born, africa, asia, central, america, caribbean, ]
[state, central, role, history, reflected, hosting, highest, numbers, historic, landmarks, per, capita, ]
[sixteen, maryland, counties, well, city, baltimore, border, tidal, waters, chesapeake, bay, estuary, many, tributaries, 20, 10, combined, total, miles, shoreline, ]
[although, one, smallest, states, features, variety, climates, topographical, features, earned, moniker, america, miniature, ]
[21, similar, vein, maryland, geography, culture, history, combine, elements, northeastern, southern, regions, country, ]
[george, calvert, 1st, baron, baltimore, sought, charter, king, charles, territory, massachusetts, north, virginia, immediate, south, ]
[22, baltimore, died, april, 1632, charter, granted, son, cecilius, calvert, 2nd, baron, baltimore, june, 20, 1632, ]
[officially, new, maryland, colony, named, honor, henrietta, maria, france, wife, charles, ]
[23, lord, baltimore, initially, proposed, name, crescentia, land, growth, increase, king, proposed, terra, mariae, mary, land, concluded, inserted, bill, ]
[16, original, capital, maryland, mary, city, north, shore, potomac, river, county, surrounding, first, province, 24, first, called, augusta, carolina, king, later, named, mary, county, ]
[25, lord, baltimore, first, settlers, arrived, new, colony, march, 1634, younger, brother, honorable, leonard, calvert, first, provincial, governor, maryland, ]
[made, first, permanent, settlement, mary, city, mary, county, ]
[purchased, site, paramount, chief, region, eager, establish, trade, ]
[mary, became, first, capital, maryland, remained, 60, years, 1695, ]
[settlers, soon, followed, ]
[tobacco, crops, successful, quickly, made, new, colony, profitable, ]
[however, given, incidence, malaria, yellow, fever, typhoid, life, expectancy, maryland, 10, years, less, new, england, ]
[26, maryland, founded, provide, england, roman, catholic, minority, ]
[27, although, maryland, heavily, catholic, english, mainland, colonies, religion, still, minority, consisting, less, 10, total, population, ]
[28, 1642, number, puritans, left, virginia, maryland, founded, providence, called, annapolis, western, shore, upper, chesapeake, bay, ]
[29, dispute, traders, virginia, kent, island, chesapeake, led, armed, conflict, ]
[1644, william, claiborne, puritan, seized, kent, island, associate, puritan, richard, ingle, took, st, ]
[mary, ]
[30, used, religion, tool, gain, popular, support, ]
[two, years, 1644, 1646, claiborne, puritan, associates, held, sway, known, plundering, time, ]
[captured, jesuit, priests, imprisoned, sent, back, england, ]
[1646, leonard, calvert, returned, troops, recaptured, mary, city, restored, order, ]
[house, delegates, passed, act, concerning, religion, 1649, granting, religious, liberty, trinitarian, christians, ]
[26, 1650, puritans, revolted, proprietary, government, ]
[protestants, swept, catholics, legislature, religious, strife, returned, ]
[26, puritans, set, new, government, prohibiting, roman, catholicism, anglicanism, ]
[puritan, revolutionary, government, persecuted, maryland, catholics, reign, known, plundering, time, ]
[mobs, burned, original, catholic, churches, southern, maryland, ]
[puritan, rule, lasted, 1658, calvert, family, lord, baltimore, regained, proprietary, control, toleration, act, ]
[england, glorious, revolution, 1688, maryland, outlawed, catholicism, ]
[1704, maryland, general, assembly, prohibited, catholics, operating, schools, limited, corporate, ownership, property, hamper, religious, orders, expanding, supporting, encouraged, conversion, catholic, children, ]
[28, celebration, catholic, sacraments, also, officially, restricted, ]
[state, affairs, lasted, american, revolutionary, war, ]
[wealthy, catholic, planters, built, chapels, land, practice, religion, relative, secrecy, ]
[18th, century, individual, priests, lay, leaders, claimed, maryland, farms, belonging, jesuits, personal, property, bequeathed, order, evade, legal, restrictions, religious, organizations, owning, property, ]
[28, royal, charter, granted, maryland, land, north, potomac, river, 40th, parallel, ]
[problem, arose, charles, ii, granted, charter, pennsylvania, ]
[grant, defined, pennsylvania, southern, border, identical, maryland, northern, border, 40th, parallel, ]
[grant, indicated, charles, ii, william, penn, assumed, 40th, parallel, would, pass, close, new, castle, delaware, falls, north, philadelphia, site, penn, already, selected, colony, capital, city, ]
[negotiations, ensued, problem, discovered, 1681, ]
[compromise, proposed, charles, ii, 1682, undermined, penn, receiving, additional, grant, delaware, ]
[32, penn, successfully, argued, maryland, charter, entitled, lord, baltimore, unsettled, lands, dutch, settlement, delaware, predated, charter, ]
[dispute, remained, unresolved, nearly, century, carried, descendants, william, penn, lord, calvert, family, controlled, maryland, penn, family, controlled, pennsylvania, ]
[32, border, dispute, pennsylvania, led, cresap, war, 1730s, ]
[hostilities, erupted, 1730, escalated, first, half, decade, culminating, deployment, military, forces, maryland, 1736, pennsylvania, 1737, ]
[armed, phase, conflict, ended, may, 1738, intervention, king, george, ii, compelled, negotiation, ]
[provisional, agreement, established, 1732, ]
[32, negotiations, continued, final, agreement, signed, 1760, ]
[agreement, defined, border, maryland, pennsylvania, line, latitude, known, line, ]
[maryland, border, delaware, based, transpeninsular, line, circle, around, new, castle, ]
[32, english, colonists, arrived, maryland, indentured, servants, serve, several, years, term, laborers, pay, passage, ]
[33, early, years, line, indentured, servants, african, slaves, laborers, fluid, white, black, laborers, commonly, lived, worked, together, formed, unions, ]
[children, born, white, mothers, considered, free, principle, partus, sequitur, ventrem, children, took, social, status, mothers, principle, slave, law, adopted, throughout, colonies, following, virginia, 1662, ]
[many, free, black, families, migrated, delaware, land, cheaper, ]
[34, flow, indentured, laborers, colony, decreased, improving, economic, conditions, england, planters, maryland, imported, thousands, slaves, racial, caste, lines, hardened, ]
[maryland, one, thirteen, colonies, revolted, british, rule, american, revolution, ]
[near, end, american, revolutionary, war, february, 2, 1781, maryland, became, last, 13th, state, approve, ratification, articles, confederation, perpetual, union, first, proposed, 1776, adopted, second, continental, congress, 1778, brought, united, states, united, sovereign, national, state, ]
[also, became, seventh, state, admitted, union, ratifying, new, federal, constitution, 1788, ]
[december, 1790, maryland, donated, land, selected, first, president, george, washington, federal, government, creation, new, national, capital, washington, ]
[land, provided, along, north, shore, potomac, river, montgomery, prince, george, counties, well, fairfax, county, alexandria, south, shore, potomac, virginia, however, land, donated, commonwealth, virginia, later, returned, state, district, columbia, retrocession, 1846, ]
[influenced, changing, economy, revolutionary, ideals, preaching, ministers, numerous, planters, maryland, freed, slaves, 20, years, revolutionary, war, ]
[across, upper, south, free, black, population, increased, less, 1, war, 14, 1810, ]
[35, abolitionists, harriet, tubman, frederick, douglass, born, slaves, time, dorchester, county, talbot, county, respectively, ]
[36, 37, war, 1812, british, military, attempted, capture, baltimore, protected, fort, mchenry, ]
[bombardment, song, banner, written, francis, scott, key, later, adopted, national, anthem, ]
[national, road, hwy, 40, today, authorized, 1817, ran, baltimore, first, federal, highway, ]
[baltimore, ohio, railroad, b, first, chartered, railroad, united, states, ]
[opened, first, section, track, regular, operation, 1830, baltimore, ellicott, city, 38, 1852, became, first, rail, line, reach, ohio, river, eastern, seaboard, ]
[39, state, remained, union, civil, war, 40, due, significant, part, demographics, federal, intervention, ]
[1860, census, held, shortly, outbreak, civil, war, showed, 49, maryland, african, americans, free, ]
[35, governor, thomas, holliday, hicks, suspended, state, legislature, help, ensure, election, new, governor, legislature, president, abraham, lincoln, number, politicians, arrested, including, mayor, baltimore, george, william, brown, suspended, several, civil, liberties, including, habeas, corpus, ordered, artillery, placed, federal, hill, overlooking, baltimore, ]
[april, 1861, federal, units, state, regiments, attacked, marched, baltimore, sparking, baltimore, riot, 1861, first, bloodshed, civil, war, ]
[41, marylanders, joined, military, civil, war, around, 77, joined, union, army, remainder, joined, confederate, army, ]
[citation, needed, largest, significant, battle, state, battle, antietam, september, 17, 1862, near, sharpsburg, ]
[although, tactical, draw, battle, considered, strategic, union, victory, turning, point, war, ]
[new, state, constitution, 1864, abolished, slavery, maryland, first, recognized, free, state, context, ]
[42, following, passage, constitutional, amendments, granted, voting, rights, freedmen, 1867, state, extended, suffrage, males, ]
[democratic, party, rapidly, regained, power, state, republicans, ]
[democrats, replaced, constitution, 1864, constitution, 1867, ]
[following, end, reconstruction, 1877, democrats, devised, means, disenfranchising, blacks, initially, physical, intimidation, voter, fraud, later, constitutional, amendments, laws, ]
[blacks, immigrants, however, resisted, democratic, party, disfranchisement, efforts, state, ]
[maryland, blacks, part, biracial, republican, coalition, elected, state, government, comprised, 20, electorate, ]
[43, compared, states, blacks, better, established, civil, war, ]
[nearly, half, black, population, free, war, accumulated, property, ]
[half, population, lived, cities, ]
[literacy, high, among, blacks, democrats, crafted, means, exclude, suffrage, campaigns, helped, reach, blacks, teach, resist, ]
[43, whites, impose, racial, segregation, public, facilities, jim, crow, laws, effectively, lasted, passage, federal, civil, rights, legislation, ]
[baltimore, grew, significantly, industrial, revolution, due, large, part, seaport, good, railroad, connections, attracting, european, immigrant, labor, ]
[many, manufacturing, businesses, established, baltimore, area, civil, war, ]
[baltimore, businessmen, including, johns, hopkins, enoch, pratt, george, peabody, henry, walters, founded, notable, city, institutions, bear, names, including, respectively, university, library, system, music, dance, conservatory, art, museum, ]
[cumberland, maryland, city, 19th, century, ]
[nearby, supplies, natural, resources, along, railroads, fostered, growth, major, manufacturing, center, ]
[44, progressive, era, late, 19th, early, 20th, centuries, brought, political, reforms, ]
[series, laws, passed, 1892, 1908, reformers, worked, standard, ballots, rather, distributed, marked, parties, obtained, closed, voting, booths, prevent, party, workers, assisting, voters, initiated, primary, elections, keep, party, bosses, selecting, candidates, candidates, listed, without, party, symbols, discouraged, illiterate, participating, ]
[measures, worked, whites, blacks, ]
[blacks, resisted, efforts, suffrage, groups, conducting, voter, education, ]
[blacks, defeated, three, efforts, disenfranchise, making, alliances, immigrants, resist, various, democratic, campaigns, ]
[43, disenfranchisement, bills, 1905, 1907, 1911, rebuffed, large, part, black, opposition, ]
[blacks, comprised, 20, electorate, immigrants, comprised, 15, legislature, difficulty, devising, requirements, blacks, also, disadvantage, immigrants, ]
[43, progressive, era, also, brought, reforms, working, conditions, maryland, labor, force, ]
[1902, state, regulated, conditions, mines, outlawed, child, laborers, age, 12, mandated, compulsory, school, attendance, enacted, nation, first, workers, compensation, law, ]
[workers, compensation, law, overturned, courts, redrafted, finally, enacted, 1910, ]
[great, baltimore, fire, 1904, burned, 30, hours, destroying, buildings, spanning, 70, city, blocks, ]
[firefighters, worked, bring, blaze, control, ]
[nation, entry, world, war, 1917, new, military, bases, camp, meade, aberdeen, proving, ground, edgewood, arsenal, established, ]
[existing, facilities, including, fort, mchenry, greatly, expanded, ]
[georgia, congressman, william, upshaw, criticized, maryland, openly, 1923, passing, prohibition, laws, baltimore, sun, editor, hamilton, owens, coined, free, state, nickname, maryland, context, popularized, mencken, series, newspaper, editorials, ]
[42, 45, maryland, urban, rural, communities, different, experiences, great, depression, ]
[bonus, army, marched, state, 1932, way, washington, maryland, instituted, first, income, tax, 1937, generate, revenue, schools, welfare, ]
[46, passenger, freight, steamboat, service, important, throughout, chesapeake, bay, many, tributary, rivers, ended, 1962, ]
[47, baltimore, major, war, production, center, world, war, ii, ]
[biggest, operations, bethlehem, steel, fairfield, yard, built, liberty, ships, glenn, martin, aircraft, manufacturer, ]
[maryland, experienced, population, growth, following, world, war, ii, ]
[beginning, 1960s, suburban, growth, took, hold, around, washington, baltimore, state, began, take, culture, opposed, traditionally, southern, tidewater, culture, previously, dominated, state, ]
[agricultural, tracts, gave, way, residential, communities, carefully, planned, columbia, charles, montgomery, village, ]
[concurrently, interstate, highway, system, built, throughout, state, notably, capital, beltway, altering, travel, patterns, ]
[1952, eastern, western, halves, maryland, linked, first, time, chesapeake, bay, bridge, replaced, nearby, ferry, service, ]
[48, maryland, regions, experienced, economic, changes, following, wwii, ]
[heavy, manufacturing, declined, baltimore, ]
[maryland, four, westernmost, counties, industrial, railroad, coal, mining, jobs, declined, ]
[lower, eastern, shore, family, farms, bought, major, concerns, poultry, farms, vegetable, farming, became, prevalent, ]
[southern, maryland, tobacco, farming, nearly, vanished, due, suburban, development, state, tobacco, program, 1990s, ]
[effort, reverse, depopulation, due, loss, industries, baltimore, initiated, urban, renewal, projects, 1960s, charles, center, baltimore, world, trade, center, ]
[resulted, intact, residential, neighborhoods, producing, social, volatility, older, residential, areas, around, harbor, units, renovated, become, popular, new, populations, ]
[maryland, area, square, miles, km2, comparable, overall, area, belgium, square, miles, km2, ]
[49, state, closest, size, state, hawaii, square, miles, km2, next, smallest, state, ]
[next, largest, state, maryland, neighbor, west, virginia, nearly, twice, size, maryland, square, miles, km2, ]
[maryland, possesses, variety, topography, within, borders, contributing, nickname, america, miniature, ]
[50, ranges, sandy, dunes, dotted, seagrass, east, low, marshlands, teeming, wildlife, large, bald, cypress, near, chesapeake, bay, gently, rolling, hills, oak, forests, piedmont, region, pine, groves, maryland, mountains, west, ]
[maryland, bounded, north, pennsylvania, north, east, delaware, east, atlantic, ocean, south, west, across, potomac, river, west, virginia, virginia, ]
[border, virginia, interrupted, washington, sits, land, originally, part, montgomery, prince, george, counties, including, town, georgetown, maryland, ]
[land, ceded, united, states, federal, government, 1790, form, washington, chesapeake, bay, nearly, bisects, state, counties, east, bay, known, collectively, eastern, shore, ]
[state, waterways, part, chesapeake, bay, watershed, exceptions, tiny, portion, extreme, western, garrett, county, drained, youghiogheny, river, part, watershed, mississippi, river, eastern, half, worcester, county, drains, maryland, atlantic, coastal, bays, small, portion, state, northeast, corner, drains, delaware, river, watershed, ]
[prominent, chesapeake, maryland, geography, economic, life, periodic, agitation, change, state, official, nickname, bay, state, nickname, used, massachusetts, decades, ]
[highest, point, maryland, elevation, feet, hoye, crest, backbone, mountain, southwest, corner, garrett, county, near, border, west, virginia, near, headwaters, north, branch, potomac, river, ]
[close, small, town, hancock, western, maryland, way, across, state, less, 2, miles, km, separates, borders, 51, line, north, potomac, river, south, ]
[portions, maryland, included, various, official, unofficial, geographic, regions, ]
[example, delmarva, peninsula, composed, eastern, shore, counties, maryland, entire, state, delaware, two, counties, make, eastern, shore, virginia, whereas, westernmost, counties, maryland, considered, part, appalachia, ]
[much, corridor, lies, south, piedmont, coastal, plain, 52, though, straddles, border, two, regions, ]
[earthquakes, maryland, infrequent, small, due, state, distance, zones, ]
[53, 54, virginia, earthquake, 2011, felt, moderately, throughout, maryland, ]
[buildings, state, earthquakes, suffer, damage, easily, ]
[55, maryland, natural, lakes, mostly, due, lack, glacial, history, area, ]
[56, lakes, state, today, constructed, mostly, via, dams, ]
[57, buckel, bog, believed, geologists, remnant, former, natural, lake, ]
[58, maryland, shale, formations, containing, natural, gas, fracking, theoretically, possible, ]
[59, typical, states, east, coast, maryland, plant, life, abundant, healthy, ]
[modest, volume, annual, precipitation, helps, support, many, types, plants, including, seagrass, various, reeds, smaller, end, spectrum, gigantic, wye, oak, huge, example, white, oak, state, tree, grow, 70, feet, 21, tall, ]
[middle, atlantic, coastal, forests, typical, southeastern, atlantic, coastal, plain, grow, around, chesapeake, bay, delmarva, peninsula, ]
[moving, west, mixture, northeastern, coastal, forests, southeastern, mixed, forests, cover, central, part, state, ]
[appalachian, mountains, western, maryland, home, ridge, forests, ]
[give, way, appalachian, mixed, mesophytic, forests, near, west, virginia, border, ]
[61, many, foreign, species, cultivated, state, ornamentals, others, novelty, species, ]
[included, among, crape, myrtle, italian, cypress, southern, magnolia, live, oak, warmer, parts, state, 62, even, hardy, palm, trees, warmer, central, eastern, parts, state, ]
[63, usda, plant, hardiness, zones, state, range, zones, 5, 6, extreme, western, part, state, zone, 7, central, part, zone, 8, around, southern, part, coast, bay, area, parts, metropolitan, baltimore, ]
[64, invasive, plant, species, kudzu, tree, heaven, multiflora, rose, japanese, stiltgrass, stifle, growth, endemic, plant, life, ]
[65, maryland, state, flower, susan, grows, abundance, wild, flower, groups, throughout, state, ]
[state, harbors, considerable, number, deer, especially, woody, mountainous, west, state, overpopulation, become, problem, ]
[mammals, found, ranging, mountains, west, central, areas, include, black, bears, 66, bobcats, 67, foxes, coyotes, 68, raccoons, otters, ]
[66, population, rare, wild, feral, horses, found, assateague, island, ]
[69, believed, descended, horses, escaped, spanish, galleon, shipwrecks, ]
[69, every, year, last, week, july, captured, swim, across, shallow, bay, sale, chincoteague, virginia, conservation, technique, ensures, tiny, island, overrun, horses, ]
[69, ponies, sale, popularized, children, book, misty, chincoteague, ]
[purebred, chesapeake, bay, retriever, dog, bred, specifically, water, sports, hunting, search, rescue, chesapeake, area, ]
[70, 1878, chesapeake, bay, retriever, first, individual, retriever, breed, recognized, american, kennel, club, ]
[70, later, adopted, university, maryland, baltimore, county, mascot, ]
[maryland, reptile, amphibian, population, includes, diamondback, terrapin, turtle, adopted, mascot, university, maryland, college, park, well, threatened, eastern, box, turtle, ]
[71, state, part, territory, baltimore, oriole, official, state, bird, mascot, mlb, team, baltimore, orioles, ]
[72, aside, oriole, 435, species, birds, reported, maryland, ]
[73, state, insect, baltimore, checkerspot, butterfly, although, common, maryland, southern, edge, range, ]
[74, maryland, joined, neighboring, states, end, 20th, century, improve, health, chesapeake, bay, ]
[bay, aquatic, life, seafood, industry, threatened, development, fertilizer, livestock, waste, entering, bay, ]
[75, 76, 2007, rated, maryland, fifth, greenest, state, country, behind, three, pacific, states, vermont, ]
[maryland, ranks, 40th, total, energy, consumption, nationwide, managed, less, toxic, waste, per, capita, six, states, 2005, ]
[77, april, 2007, maryland, joined, regional, greenhouse, gas, initiative, rggi, regional, initiative, formed, northeastern, states, washington, three, canadian, provinces, reduce, greenhouse, gas, emissions, ]
[78, march, 2017, maryland, became, first, state, proven, gas, reserves, ban, fracking, passing, law, ]
[vermont, law, shale, gas, new, york, ban, though, made, executive, order, ]
[59, maryland, wide, array, climates, due, local, variances, elevation, proximity, water, protection, colder, weather, due, downslope, winds, ]
[eastern, half, maryland, includes, cities, ocean, city, salisbury, annapolis, southern, eastern, suburbs, washington, baltimore, lies, atlantic, coastal, plain, flat, topography, sandy, muddy, soil, ]
[region, humid, subtropical, climate, köppen, cfa, hot, humid, summers, cool, cold, winters, falls, usda, hardiness, zone, 8a, ]
[64, western, maryland, higher, elevations, allegany, garrett, counties, including, cities, cumberland, frostburg, oakland, display, characteristics, humid, continental, zone, due, part, elevation, ]
[fall, usda, hardiness, zones, 6b, ]
[64, precipitation, state, characteristic, east, coast, ]
[annual, rainfall, ranges, 35, 45, inches, 890, mm, higher, elevations, ]
[nearly, every, part, maryland, receives, inches, mm, per, month, rain, ]
[average, annual, snowfall, varies, 9, inches, 23, cm, coastal, areas, 100, inches, 250, cm, western, mountains, state, ]
[79, location, near, atlantic, coast, maryland, somewhat, vulnerable, tropical, cyclones, although, delmarva, peninsula, outer, banks, north, carolina, provide, large, buffer, strikes, major, hurricanes, category, 3, occur, infrequently, ]
[often, maryland, gets, remnants, tropical, system, already, come, ashore, released, energy, ]
[maryland, averages, around, days, thunderstorms, year, averages, around, six, tornado, strikes, annually, ]
[80, population, maryland, lives, central, region, state, baltimore, metropolitan, area, washington, metropolitan, area, part, metropolitan, area, ]
[majority, maryland, population, concentrated, cities, suburbs, surrounding, washington, well, around, maryland, populous, city, baltimore, ]
[historically, many, maryland, cities, developed, along, fall, line, line, along, rivers, brooks, streams, interrupted, rapids, waterfalls, ]
[maryland, capital, city, annapolis, one, exception, pattern, since, lies, along, banks, severn, river, close, empties, chesapeake, bay, ]
[eastern, shore, less, populous, rural, counties, western, maryland, ]
[two, westernmost, counties, maryland, allegany, garrett, mountainous, sparsely, populated, resembling, west, virginia, appalachia, rest, state, ]
[eastern, western, maryland, however, dotted, cities, regional, importance, ocean, city, princess, anne, salisbury, eastern, shore, cumberland, frostburg, hancock, western, maryland, ]
[southern, maryland, still, somewhat, rural, suburbanization, washington, encroached, significantly, since, 1960s, important, local, population, centers, include, lexington, park, prince, frederick, california, waldorf, ]
[91, 92, 2020, united, states, census, united, states, census, bureau, found, population, maryland, people, increase, 2010, united, states, census, ]
[93, united, states, census, bureau, estimated, population, maryland, july, 1, 2019, increase, 2010, united, states, census, increase, prior, year, ]
[includes, natural, increase, since, last, census, births, minus, deaths, increase, due, net, migration, people, state, ]
[immigration, outside, united, states, resulted, net, increase, people, migration, within, country, produced, net, loss, people, ]
[94, 2018, top, countries, origin, maryland, immigrants, el, salvador, 11, india, 6, china, 5, nigeria, 5, philippines, 4, ]
[95, center, population, maryland, located, county, line, anne, arundel, county, howard, county, unincorporated, community, jessup, ]
[96, maryland, history, border, state, led, exhibit, characteristics, northern, southern, regions, united, states, ]
[generally, rural, western, maryland, west, virginian, panhandle, pennsylvania, appalachian, culture, southern, eastern, shore, regions, maryland, embody, southern, culture, 97, densely, populated, central, maryland, radiating, outward, baltimore, washington, common, northeast, ]
[98, census, bureau, designates, maryland, one, south, atlantic, states, commonly, associated, states, northeastern, united, states, federal, agencies, media, residents, ]
[99, 100, 101, 102, 103, according, hud, 2022, annual, homeless, assessment, report, estimated, homeless, people, maryland, ]
[104, 105, 2011, percent, maryland, population, younger, age, 1, minority, background, ]
[106, note, births, table, add, hispanics, counted, ethnicity, race, giving, higher, overall, number, ]
[since, 2016, data, births, white, hispanic, origin, collected, included, one, hispanic, group, persons, hispanic, origin, may, race, ]
[racial, makeup, maryland, excluding, hispanics, racial, categories, 2019, 118, nh, 2016, spoken, languages, maryland, english, spanish, 9, chinese, west, african, languages, mostly, yoruba, igbo, 1, french, 1, korean, languages, mostly, amharic, tagalog, ]
[languages, large, number, speakers, maryland, include, vietnamese, arabic, russian, hindi, urdu, persian, nepali, haitian, creole, telugu, 119, 120, 1970, census, bureau, reported, maryland, population, percent, percent, white, ]
[125, 2019, white, americans, maryland, population, white, americans, including, white, hispanics, made, maryland, majority, minority, state, ]
[126, maryland, population, hispanic, latino, highest, percentage, state, east, coast, highest, percentage, states, hawaii, new, mexico, texas, california, nevada, along, washington, 127, 2031, minorities, projected, become, majority, voting, eligible, residents, maryland, ]
[128, maryland, multiculturalism, diversity, explained, historically, large, african, american, population, immigration, brought, importance, baltimore, areas, especially, central, america, africa, caribbean, asia, ]
[african, americans, form, sizable, portion, state, population, 2020, ]
[124, descendants, people, transported, area, slaves, west, africa, ]
[concentrations, african, americans, live, baltimore, city, prince, george, county, charles, county, western, parts, baltimore, county, southern, eastern, shore, ]
[charles, county, prince, george, county, two, counties, african, americans, successful, monetarily, country, average, household, incomes, much, higher, rest, country, ]
[former, slave, state, maryland, large, population, much, history, african, american, populations, increased, time, great, migration, baltimore, areas, recent, times, new, great, migration, movement, washington, montgomery, prince, george, charles, counties, result, gentrification, rising, housing, costs, causing, many, african, americans, leave, ]
[prince, george, county, particular, magnet, african, americans, move, decades, often, referred, ward, 9, maryland, far, highest, percentage, residents, born, africa, state, residents, african, descent, include, later, immigrants, nigeria, particularly, igbo, yoruba, tribes, ethiopia, particularly, amharas, significant, oromo, tigrayan, populations, cameroon, ghana, sierra, leone, kenya, ]
[129, maryland, also, hosts, populations, african, caribbean, nations, ]
[maryland, african, immigrant, population, generally, concentrated, inner, suburbs, baltimore, nigerians, immigrant, group, maryland, largely, concentrated, baltimore, area, surrounding, suburbs, well, prince, george, county, ]
[many, immigrants, horn, africa, especially, ethiopia, settled, maryland, large, communities, suburbs, washington, particularly, montgomery, county, prince, george, county, greater, washington, area, world, largest, population, ethiopians, outside, ethiopia, ]
[130, ethiopian, community, greater, historically, based, washington, adams, morgan, shaw, neighborhoods, community, grown, many, ethiopians, settled, silver, spring, ]
[131, ethiopian, american, population, maryland, rest, area, largely, significant, numbers, speakers, oromo, tigrinya, speakers, well, ]
[washington, metropolitan, area, also, home, large, eritrean, community, ]
[top, reported, ancestries, maryland, residents, german, 15, irish, 11, english, 8, american, 7, italian, 6, polish, 3, ]
[132, irish, american, populations, found, throughout, baltimore, area, 133, northern, eastern, suburbs, washington, maryland, descendants, moved, suburbs, 134, washington, predominantly, irish, neighborhoods, 134, 135, well, western, maryland, irish, immigrant, laborers, helped, build, b, railroad, ]
[133, smaller, much, older, irish, populations, found, southern, maryland, roots, dating, far, back, early, maryland, colony, ]
[136, population, however, still, remains, culturally, active, yearly, festivals, held, ]
[137, large, percentage, population, eastern, shore, southern, maryland, descendants, british, american, ancestry, ]
[eastern, shore, settled, protestants, chiefly, methodist, southern, counties, initially, settled, english, catholics, ]
[western, northern, maryland, large, populations, ]
[recent, european, immigrants, late, 19th, early, 20th, century, settled, first, baltimore, attracted, industrial, jobs, ]
[groups, largely, jewish, italian, greek, polish, czech, lithuanian, russian, ukrainian, descent, ]
[greek, community, includes, number, greek, jews, ]
[138, southern, eastern, european, immigrants, largely, concentrated, southeast, baltimore, significantly, influenced, unique, culture, city, although, many, moved, surrounding, areas, baltimore, county, due, gentrification, city, retains, culture, influence, immigrants, cultural, events, celebrating, communities, common, baltimore, ]
[maryland, significant, jewish, american, presence, since, early, 20th, century, large, numbers, jewish, immigrants, baltimore, area, followed, jewish, migration, washington, area, maryland, percentage, jewish, residents, country, including, washington, jews, making, 4, percent, population, area, number, jews, combined, metropolitan, area, country, jewish, population, estimated, ]
[citation, needed, shares, european, immigrants, born, eastern, europe, increased, significantly, 1990, 2010, ]
[following, dissolution, soviet, union, yugoslavia, czechoslovakia, many, immigrants, eastern, europe, came, united, percent, currently, reside, maryland, ]
[139, 140, hispanic, immigrants, later, 20th, century, settled, aspen, hill, park, bladensburg, riverdale, park, gaithersburg, well, highlandtown, greektown, east, baltimore, ]
[maryland, highest, percentage, residents, central, american, origin, state, ]
[citation, needed, salvadorans, largest, hispanic, group, maryland, maryland, largest, percentage, salvadoran, residents, state, ]
[citation, needed, area, also, highest, percentage, salvadorans, american, metro, area, particularly, concentrated, prince, george, montgomery, counties, total, number, salvadorans, los, angeles, area, ]
[hispanic, groups, significant, populations, state, include, mexicans, guatemalans, hondurans, dominicans, peruvians, puerto, ricans, along, growing, populations, brazilians, colombians, ecuadorians, bolivians, ]
[maryland, hispanic, population, especially, concentrated, montgomery, county, prince, george, county, large, populations, baltimore, area, frederick, county, ]
[maryland, one, diverse, hispanic, populations, country, significant, populations, various, caribbean, central, american, nations, ]
[141, caribbean, americans, significant, presence, maryland, especially, jamaican, americans, make, population, significant, presence, influence, maryland, politics, culture, maryland, current, governor, wes, moore, son, jamaican, immigrant, mother, ]
[caribbean, american, nationalities, large, population, maryland, include, dominicans, haitians, trinidadians, tobagonians, guyanese, ]
[caribbean, americans, concentrated, prince, george, county, city, baltimore, baltimore, county, ]
[asian, americans, concentrated, suburban, counties, surrounding, washington, baltimore, suburbs, especially, howard, county, chinese, american, korean, american, taiwanese, american, communities, rockville, gaithersburg, germantown, ]
[chinese, particular, form, second, largest, group, asian, americans, largest, group, montgomery, county, ]
[citation, needed, maryland, also, large, korean, american, population, especially, howard, county, koreatown, ellicott, city, ]
[142, 143, filipino, americans, largest, group, southeast, asians, form, major, communities, montgomery, prince, george, charles, counties, large, groups, southeast, asians, include, vietnamese, concentrated, montgomery, county, burmese, concentrated, frederick, howard, baltimore, counties, ]
[citation, needed, maryland, large, diverse, south, asian, american, population, major, presence, state, since, 1970s, ]
[indian, americans, largest, asian, group, maryland, making, percent, population, live, throughout, state, especially, montgomery, howard, counties, large, numbers, baltimore, frederick, prince, george, counties, ]
[citation, needed, indian, american, population, culturally, linguistically, diverse, indian, languages, spoken, hindi, gujarati, telugu, tamil, ]
[citation, needed, also, large, pakistani, american, populations, throughout, baltimore, areas, especially, baltimore, county, howard, county, large, bangladeshi, american, community, ]
[area, ]
[citation, needed, maryland, one, largest, populations, nepali, americans, including, bhutanese, americans, nepali, descent, many, recent, immigrants, refugees, sought, asylum, expulsion, bhutan, 2015, nepal, earthquake, estimated, nepalis, maryland, concentrated, baltimore, area, significant, populations, ]
[area, ]
[citation, needed, first, nepali, american, elected, state, legislature, harry, bhandari, elected, maryland, representing, part, baltimore, county, ]
[144, 145, attracting, educated, asians, africans, professional, jobs, region, maryland, proportions, racial, minorities, country, ]
[146, 2006, counted, foreign, born, represents, mainly, people, latin, america, asia, ]
[four, percent, undocumented, immigrants, ]
[147, according, williams, institute, analysis, 2010, census, couples, living, maryland, representing, couples, per, households, ]
[148, maryland, historically, prominent, american, catholic, tradition, english, colony, maryland, intended, george, calvert, english, catholics, ]
[baltimore, seat, first, catholic, bishop, 1789, emmitsburg, home, burial, place, first, citizen, canonized, elizabeth, ann, seton, ]
[georgetown, university, first, catholic, university, founded, 1789, part, maryland, became, part, district, columbia, created, 1790s, ]
[basilica, national, shrine, assumption, virgin, mary, baltimore, first, roman, catholic, cathedral, built, united, states, archbishop, baltimore, albeit, without, formal, primacy, united, states, citation, needed, often, cardinal, ]
[among, immigrants, 19th, 20th, centuries, eastern, southern, europe, many, catholics, ]
[despite, historic, relevance, catholic, church, united, states, percentage, catholics, state, maryland, national, average, 20, ]
[demographically, protestants, identifying, religion, numerous, catholics, ]
[according, pew, research, center, 2014, 69, percent, maryland, population, identifies, christian, ]
[nearly, 52, adult, population, protestants, ]
[following, protestantism, catholicism, second, largest, religious, affiliation, comprising, 15, percent, population, ]
[149, 150, communities, found, mary, garrett, cecil, counties, ]
[151, judaism, largest, religion, maryland, adherents, four, percent, total, population, ]
[152, jews, numerous, throughout, montgomery, county, pikesville, owings, mills, northwest, baltimore, ]
[estimated, jewish, americans, live, montgomery, county, constituting, approximately, 10, total, population, ]
[153, adventist, church, world, headquarters, ahmadiyya, muslims, national, headquarters, located, silver, spring, outside, washington, ]
[per, public, religion, research, institute, 2020, 61, percent, maryland, population, identified, christianity, ]
[154, protestantism, roman, catholicism, continued, dominate, christian, landscape, jewish, community, remained, 3, total, religious, population, ]
[unaffiliated, prri, study, determined, increase, 28, population, ]
[maryland, one, highest, percentages, lgbt, people, populace, state, marylanders, identify, lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, highest, state, ]
[washington, ranks, higher, lgbt, population, ]
[maryland, ranks, one, best, states, nation, rights, lgbt, community, protections, discrimination, enacted, since, 2001, sexuality, 2014, gender, marriage, legalization, 2013, bans, conversion, therapy, enacted, 2018, abolition, gay, panic, defense, 2021, issuance, 2023, executive, order, protecting, rights, transgender, individuals, ]
[2020, montgomery, county, unanimously, passed, ordinance, implementing, bill, rights, ]
[first, person, known, describe, drag, queen, william, dorsey, swann, born, enslaved, hancock, maryland, ]
[swann, first, american, record, pursued, legal, political, action, defend, lgbtq, community, right, assemble, ]
[155, february, 2010, attorney, general, doug, gansler, issued, opinion, stating, maryland, law, honor, marriages, state, ]
[time, state, supreme, court, wrote, decision, upholding, marriage, discrimination, ]
[148, made, ]
[thanks, stopping, ]
[confident, find, sorts, inspiring, useful, things, ]
[sometimes, tough, dig, ]
[blue, crabs, bay, trails, rides, hikes, day, ]
[click, little, button, get, sense, think, like, us, much, ]
[start, destinationmaryland, magazine, start, planning, trip, free, visitor, guide, ]
[get, officialmaryland, newsletter, get, email, updates, top, things, travel, deals, events, ]
[tag, photos, instagram, mdinfocus, patricia, hill, collins, honored, research, intersections, gender, race, class, city, county, university, leaders, gather, talk, economic, development, quantum, ecosystem, purple, line, gift, long, jiang, support, faculty, research, doctoral, students, robert, smith, school, business, biden, recognizes, jeong, kim, 91, advances, broadband, optical, systems, data, communications, wireless, technologies, art, technology, social, justice, arts, initiative, partners, arts, sciences, technology, disciplines, develop, new, experiential, offerings, nurture, different, ways, thinking, spark, dialogue, understanding, problem, solving, action, ]
[arts, university, maryland, college, park, state, flagship, university, one, nation, preeminent, public, research, universities, ]
[global, leader, research, entrepreneurship, innovation, university, home, students, faculty, staff, nearly, alumni, dedicated, pursuit, fearless, ideas, ]
[located, outside, washington, discover, share, new, knowledge, every, day, renowned, research, enterprise, programs, academics, arts, athletics, ]
[committed, social, entrepreneurship, nation, first, good, campus, ]
[introducing, nation, first, good, campus, transforming, idealism, impact, top, public, national, university, source, news, world, report, best, colleges, students, source, 2023, campus, pride, index, among, public, universities, source, 2023, forbes, list, america, top, colleges, undergraduate, program, entrepreneurship, source, princeton, review, entrepreneurship, magazine, rankings, fast, facts, spanning, 12, schools, colleges, maryland, offers, 300, programs, many, ranked, among, best, country, ]
[faculty, includes, two, nobel, laureates, three, pulitzer, prize, winners, 58, members, national, academies, scores, fulbright, scholars, ]
[students, include, highest, achievers, state, nation, enjoy, experiences, unique, location, outside, nation, capital, including, internships, research, leadership, service, opportunities, ]
[university, maryland, one, world, premier, research, institutions, ]
[strategic, location, scores, partnerships, government, businesses, umd, conducts, groundbreaking, research, biggest, challenges, facing, global, community, including, cybersecurity, terrorism, bioengineering, public, health, equity, food, safety, climate, change, ]
[strive, discover, new, knowledge, put, work, innovation, entrepreneurship, advancing, economic, development, transforming, lives, ]
[newly, launched, innovation, gateway, guide, resources, programs, partners, spaces, need, activate, scale, fearless, ideas, innovations, launch, new, ventures, catalyze, growth, advance, economic, development, ]
[improve, lives, every, person, earth, reimagine, teaching, learning, accelerate, solutions, grand, challenges, time, creativity, discovery, forge, diverse, inclusive, community, differences, celebrated, equity, relentlessly, pursued, ]
[together, dedicate, advancing, public, good, individual, enduringly, bound, collective, ]
[read, strategic, plan, university, maryland, arts, humanities, sciences, intersect, address, important, societal, issues, shed, new, light, human, experience, ]
[vibrant, campus, arts, community, collaborates, local, national, cultural, organizations, phillips, collection, kennedy, center, folger, shakespeare, library, ]
[student, faculty, artists, designers, historians, writers, performers, exploring, new, media, presenting, new, perspectives, investigating, new, techniques, engaging, new, audiences, ]
[terrapinstrong, ]
[want, join, community, striving, equity, inclusion, social, justice, belong, ]
[darryll, pines, president, terrapinstrong, home, terrapins, university, maryland, one, nation, recognizable, successful, athletics, programs, ]
[550, compete, year, 20, intercollegiate, women, eight, men, ]
[since, 2005, alone, maryland, 19, national, championships, including, ncaa, titles, women, basketball, men, soccer, men, lacrosse, women, lacrosse, field, hockey, ]
[since, joining, big, ten, conference, 2014, umd, combined, 32, regular, season, tournament, championships, ]
[fear, turtle, ]
[university, maryland, proud, nation, first, good, campus, ]
[remember, college, experience, course, changed, ]
[one, got, excited, learning, wanted, life, ]
[imagine, campus, college, experiences, inspiring, enabled, good, ]
[learn, good, terp, experience, extends, beyond, classrooms, labs, studios, ]
[encompasses, residence, halls, dining, halls, clubs, sports, fraternities, sororities, campus, events, performances, countless, destinations, ]
[maryland, touts, student, organizations, dozens, prestigious, living, learning, communities, countless, ways, get, involved, ]
[students, create, unique, identity, grow, individuals, even, part, diverse, community, ]
[support, clark, challenge, maryland, promise, scholarship, double, impact, clark, challenge, keep, learning, ]
[earn, four, credits, three, weeks, ]
[courses, offered, campus, anywhere, online, ]
[meet, goals, university, maryland, winter, session, january, 2024, ]
[learn, ]
[latest, news, maryland, today, media, releases, visit, umd, right, explore, events, campus, calendar, terps, bold, smart, curious, proud, ]
[good, communities, world, ]
[fearless, ]
[always, looking, expand, ranks, ]
[interested, becoming, university, maryland, student, ]
[start, ]
[giving, back, fearless, terp, tradition, many, ways, keep, alive, also, make, instant, impact, ]
[give, support, clark, challenge, maryland, promise, scholarship, double, impact, clark, challenge, ]
[university, maryland, youtube, university, maryland, facebook, university, maryland, twitter, university, maryland, instagram, sources, https, https, https, https, https, ]
